Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 4. Immediate Custody, Arrest, Detention and Shelter Care.
§ 16.1-253.2.
Violation of provisions of protective orders; penalty.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who violates any provision of a protective order issued pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

,

16.1-253.4

,

16.1-278.14

, or

16.1-279.1

or subsection B of §

20-103

, when such violation involves a provision of the protective order that prohibits such person from (i) going or remaining upon land, buildings, or premises; (ii) further acts of family abuse; or (iii) committing a criminal offense, or which prohibits contacts by the respondent with the allegedly abused person or family or household members of the allegedly abused person as the court deems appropriate, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The punishment for any person convicted of a second offense of violating a protective order, when the offense is committed within five years of the prior conviction and when either the instant or prior offense was based on an act or threat of violence, shall include a mandatory minimum term of confinement of 60 days. Any person convicted of a third or subsequent offense of violating a protective order, when the offense is committed within 20 years of the first conviction and when either the instant or one of the prior offenses was based on an act or threat of violence is guilty of a Class 6 felony and the punishment shall include a mandatory minimum term of confinement of six months. The mandatory minimum terms of confinement prescribed for violations of this section shall be served consecutively with any other sentence.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who, while knowingly armed with a firearm or other deadly weapon, violates any provision of a protective order with which he has been served issued pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

,

16.1-253.4

,

16.1-278.14

, or

16.1-279.1

or subsection B of §

20-103

is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

If the respondent commits an assault and battery upon any party protected by the protective order resulting in bodily injury to the party or stalks any party protected by the protective order in violation of §

18.2-60.3

, he is guilty of a Class 6 felony. Any person who violates such a protective order by furtively entering the home of any protected party while the party is present, or by entering and remaining in the home of the protected party until the party arrives, is guilty of a Class 6 felony, in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

Upon conviction of any offense hereunder for which a mandatory minimum term of confinement is not specified, the person shall be sentenced to a term of confinement and in no case shall the entire term imposed be suspended. Upon conviction, the court shall, in addition to the sentence imposed, enter a protective order pursuant to §

16.1-279.1

for a specified period not exceeding two years from the date of conviction.

A violation of this section may be prosecuted in the jurisdiction where the protective order was issued or in any county or city where any act constituting the violation of the protective order occurred.

History.

1987, c. 700; 1988, c. 501; 1991, cc. 534, 715; 1992, c. 886; 1996, c. 866; 2003, c. 219; 2004, cc. 972, 980; 2007, cc. 745, 923; 2012, c. 637; 2013, cc. 761, 774; 2016, cc. 583, 585, 638; 2020, c. 487; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 184, 529.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

. As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 529, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall supersede and control any provision of Chapter 184 of the Acts of Assembly of 2021, Special Session I.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 219 substituted “is” for “shall be” preceding “guilty” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 972 and 980 are identical, and inserted the second and third sentences.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 745 and 923 are nearly identical, and added the second and third sentences in the first paragraph; and inserted “of any offense hereunder for which a mandatory minimum term of confinement is not specified” in the beginning of the first sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 637 rewrote the first sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 761 and 774 are identical, and added the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 583, in subsection C, deleted “serious” preceding “bodily injury,” inserted “or stalks any party protected by the protective order in violation of §

18.2-60.3

,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2016 amendment by cc. 585 and 638 are identical, and designated the formerly undesignated first, second and third paragraphs subsections A, C and D, respectively; and added subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 487 added subsection E.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 184, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “16.1-253” preceding “16.1-253.1” in subsections A and B.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 311 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 339 (2009).

§ 16.1-253.3.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 886.

§ 16.1-253.4.
Emergency protective orders authorized in certain cases; penalty.

Any judge of a circuit court, general district court, juvenile and domestic relations district court or magistrate may issue a written or oral ex parte emergency protective order pursuant to this section in order to protect the health or safety of any person.

When a law-enforcement officer or an allegedly abused person asserts under oath to a judge or magistrate, and on that assertion or other evidence the judge or magistrate (i) finds that a warrant for a violation of §

18.2-57.2

has been issued or issues a warrant for violation of §

18.2-57.2

and finds that there is probable danger of further acts of family abuse against a family or household member by the respondent or (ii) finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe that the respondent has committed family abuse and there is probable danger of a further such offense against a family or household member by the respondent, the judge or magistrate shall issue an ex parte emergency protective order, except if the respondent is a minor, an emergency protective order shall not be required, imposing one or more of the following conditions on the respondent:

Prohibiting acts of family abuse or criminal offenses that result in injury to person or property;

Prohibiting such contacts by the respondent with the allegedly abused person or family or household members of the allegedly abused person, including prohibiting the respondent from being in the physical presence of the allegedly abused person or family or household members of the allegedly abused person, as the judge or magistrate deems necessary to protect the safety of such persons;

Granting the family or household member possession of the premises occupied by the parties to the exclusion of the respondent; however, no such grant of possession shall affect title to any real or personal property; and

Granting the petitioner the possession of any companion animal as defined in § 3.2-6500 if such petitioner meets the definition of owner in § 3.2-6500.When the judge or magistrate considers the issuance of an emergency protective order pursuant to clause (i), he shall presume that there is probable danger of further acts of family abuse against a family or household member by the respondent unless the presumption is rebutted by the allegedly abused person.

An emergency protective order issued pursuant to this section shall expire at 11:59 p.m. on the third day following issuance. If the expiration occurs on a day that the court is not in session, the emergency protective order shall be extended until 11:59 p.m. on the next day that the juvenile and domestic relations district court is in session. When issuing an emergency protective order under this section, the judge or magistrate shall provide the protected person or the law-enforcement officer seeking the emergency protective order with the form for use in filing petitions pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

and written information regarding protective orders that shall include the telephone numbers of domestic violence agencies and legal referral sources on a form prepared by the Supreme Court. If these forms are provided to a law-enforcement officer, the officer may provide these forms to the protected person when giving the emergency protective order to the protected person. The respondent may at any time file a motion with the court requesting a hearing to dissolve or modify the order issued hereunder. The hearing on the motion shall be given precedence on the docket of the court.

A law-enforcement officer may request an emergency protective order pursuant to this section and, if the person in need of protection is physically or mentally incapable of filing a petition pursuant to §

16.1-253.1

or

16.1-279.1

, may request the extension of an emergency protective order for an additional period of time not to exceed three days after expiration of the original order. The request for an emergency protective order or extension of an order may be made orally, in person or by electronic means, and the judge of a circuit court, general district court, or juvenile and domestic relations district court or a magistrate may issue an oral emergency protective order. An oral emergency protective order issued pursuant to this section shall be reduced to writing, by the law-enforcement officer requesting the order or the magistrate on a preprinted form approved and provided by the Supreme Court of Virginia. The completed form shall include a statement of the grounds for the order asserted by the officer or the allegedly abused person.

The court or magistrate shall forthwith, but in all cases no later than the end of the business day on which the order was issued, enter and transfer electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court or magistrate. A copy of an emergency protective order issued pursuant to this section containing any such identifying information shall be forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders. Upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith upon the respondent and due return made to the court. However, if the order is issued by the circuit court, the clerk of the circuit court shall forthwith forward an attested copy of the order containing the respondent’s identifying information and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court to the primary law-enforcement agency providing service and entry of protective orders and upon receipt of the order, the primary law-enforcement agency shall enter the name of the person subject to the order and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Network established and maintained by the Department pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

52-12

et seq.) of Title 52 and the order shall be served forthwith on the respondent. Upon service, the agency making service shall enter the date and time of service and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network and make due return to the court. One copy of the order shall be given to the allegedly abused person when it is issued, and one copy shall be filed with the written report required by subsection D of §

19.2-81.3

. The judge or magistrate who issues an oral order pursuant to an electronic request by a law-enforcement officer shall verify the written order to determine whether the officer who reduced it to writing accurately transcribed the contents of the oral order. The original copy shall be filed with the clerk of the juvenile and domestic relations district court within five business days of the issuance of the order. If the order is later dissolved or modified, a copy of the dissolution or modification order shall also be attested, forwarded forthwith to the primary law-enforcement agency responsible for service and entry of protective orders, and upon receipt of the order by the primary law-enforcement agency, the agency shall forthwith verify and enter any modification as necessary to the identifying information and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia Criminal Information Network as described above and the order shall be served forthwith and due return made to the court. Upon request, the clerk shall provide the allegedly abused person with information regarding the date and time of service.

The availability of an emergency protective order shall not be affected by the fact that the family or household member left the premises to avoid the danger of family abuse by the respondent.

The issuance of an emergency protective order shall not be considered evidence of any wrongdoing by the respondent.

As used in this section, “law-enforcement officer” means (i) any full-time or part-time employee of a police department or sheriff’s office which is part of or administered by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof and who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of the Commonwealth; (ii) any member of an auxiliary police force established pursuant to §

15.2-1731

; and (iii) any special conservator of the peace who meets the certification requirements for a law-enforcement officer as set forth in §

15.2-1706

. Part-time employees are compensated officers who are not full-time employees as defined by the employing police department or sheriff’s office.

Neither a law-enforcement agency, the attorney for the Commonwealth, a court nor the clerk’s office, nor any employee of them, may disclose, except among themselves, the residential address, telephone number, or place of employment of the person protected by the order or that of the family of such person, except to the extent that disclosure is (i) required by law or the Rules of the Supreme Court, (ii) necessary for law-enforcement purposes, or (iii) permitted by the court for good cause.

As used in this section:“Copy” includes a facsimile copy.“Physical presence” includes (i) intentionally maintaining direct visual contact with the petitioner or (ii) unreasonably being within 100 feet from the petitioner’s residence or place of employment.

No fee shall be charged for filing or serving any petition or order pursuant to this section.

Except as provided in §

16.1-253.2

, a violation of a protective order issued under this section shall constitute contempt of court.

Upon issuance of an emergency protective order, the clerk of court shall make available to the petitioner information that is published by the Department of Criminal Justice Services for victims of domestic violence or for petitioners in protective order cases.

History.

1991, c. 715; 1992, c. 742; 1994, c. 907; 1996, c. 866; 1997, c. 603; 1998, cc. 677, 684; 1999, c. 807; 2001, c. 474; 2002, cc. 508, 706, 810, 818; 2007, cc. 396, 661; 2008, cc. 73, 246; 2009, c. 732; 2011, cc. 445, 480; 2012, cc. 637, 827; 2014, cc. 346, 779, 797; 2016, c. 455; 2018, c. 652.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2014, c. 346, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 806 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 677, in subsection D, inserted the language beginning “and, if the person” following “to this section” in the first sentence and inserted the language beginning “The request” and ending “may be made” at the beginning of the present second sentence.

The 1998 amendment by c. 684, in subsection C, in the first sentence, deleted “at 5 p.m. on the next business day that the juvenile and domestic relations court is in session or” following “section shall expire” and deleted “which ever is later,” and added the present second sentence; in subsection E, substituted “Virginia criminal information network” for “Virginia crime information network” in the first and second sentences and substituted “verified by” for “forwarded for verification to” in the fourth sentence; in subsection H, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation and inserted clause (ii); and added subsection I.

The 1999 amendment

inserted “except if the respondent is a minor, an emergency protective order shall not be required” near the end of clause (ii) of subsection B.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 474 added the second sentence in subsection E.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 508 substituted “Upon” for “As soon as practicable after” at the beginning of subsection E; inserted present subsection I and redesignated former subsection I as subsection J; and added subsection K.

The 2002 amendment by c. 706, in subsection E, inserted the fifth sentence, deleted “verified by the judge or magistrate who issued the order and then” preceding “filed” in the sixth sentence, and substituted “shall be” for “shall also be attested” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 810 and 818 are identical, and in subsection E, substituted “Upon” for “As soon as practicable after” in the first sentence and deleted “feasible and” preceding “practical” in the second sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 396, in subsection B, substituted “(i) finds that a warrant” for “finds that (i) a warrant” at the beginning and “issued or issues a warrant for violation of §

18.2-57.2

and finds that there” for “issued and there” near the end of clause (i), inserted “finds that” at the beginning of clause (ii), and added the last paragraph.

The 2007 amendment by c. 661, in subsection C, inserted the third and fourth sentences, and inserted “issued hereunder” at the end of the fifth sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 73 and 246 are identical, and, in subsection C, substituted “expire at the end of the third day following issuance” for “seventy-two hours after issuance” in the first sentence, and deleted “of the seventy-two hour period” following “If the expiration” and substituted “the end” for “5 p.m.” near the beginning of the second sentence; substituted “three days” for “seventy-two hours” in the first sentence of subsection D; rewrote subsection E; and added subsection L.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 732, in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “11:59 p.m. on” for “the end of,” in the second sentence, substituted “on a day” for “at a time” and “11:59 p.m. on” for “the end of” and deleted “business” preceding “day that the”; in subsection E, in the first sentence, inserted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person,” and deleted “electronically to the Virginia Criminal Information Network” from the end, in the second sentence, deleted “and an addendum” preceding “containing any such,” in the third sentence, deleted ‘and addendum” preceding “by the primary,” in the fourth sentence, deleted “and an addendum” following “copy of the order,” inserted “the respondent’s” and “and the name, date of birth, sex, and race of each protected person provided to the court” and deleted “and addendum” following “receipt of the order”; and deleted subsection L, which read: “If any identifying information in the addendum is determined to be incorrect by the entering agency, the agency shall enter the corrected information into the Virginia Criminal Information Network.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 445 and 480 are identical, and added “or criminal offenses that result in injury to person or property” in subdivision B 1; deleted “of this subsection” following “clause (i)” in the last paragraph in subsection B; made a minor stylistic change in subsection D; and corrected the subsection reference near the middle in subsection E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 637 inserted “the allegedly abused person or” and substituted “of the allegedly abused person” for “of the respondent” in subdivision B 2.

The 2012 amendment by c. 827, effective April 18, 2012, deleted “subsection B of” preceding “§

15.2-1731

” at the end of
H (ii).

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 346 added subdivision B 4, made related changes, and added subsection L.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 779 and 797 are identical and, in subsection H, substituted “(i) any” for “any (i),” inserted “any” following “(ii),” inserted “and (iii) any special conservator of the peace who meets the certification requirements for a law-enforcement officer as set forth in §

15.2-1706

,” and made stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 455, in subdivision B 2, inserted “including prohibiting the respondent from being in the physical presence of the allegedly abused person or family or household members of the allegedly abused person”; and in subsection J, added the definition of “Physical presence” and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 652 added subsection M.

Law Review.

For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).

For article, “Making the Case to Avoid Entering the eBay Marketplace: A Recommended Analytical Framework for Evaluating Requests for Permanent Injunctions in Virginia,” see 32 Regent U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-203 Emergency Protective Order — Family Abuse.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assault and Battery, § 5;
3B M.J. Civil Rights, § 2; 9B M.J. Husband and Wife, § 87.

§ 16.1-254.
Responsibility for and limitation on transportation of children.

The detention home having custody or responsibility for supervision of a child pursuant to §§

16.1-246

,

16.1-247

,

16.1-248.1

,

16.1-249

, and

16.1-250

shall be responsible for transportation of the child to all local medical appointments, dental appointments, psychological and psychiatric evaluations. Transportation of youth to special placements pursuant to §

16.1-286

shall be the responsibility of the court service unit.

However, the chief judge of the juvenile and domestic relations district court, on the basis of guidelines approved by the Board, shall designate the appropriate agencies in each county, city and town, other than the Department of State Police, to be responsible for (i) the transportation of violent and disruptive children and (ii) the transportation of children to destinations other than those set forth in subsection A of this section, pursuant to §§

16.1-246

,

16.1-247

,

16.1-248.1

,

16.1-249

, and

16.1-250

, and as otherwise ordered by the judge.No child shall be transported with adults suspected of or charged with criminal acts.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-196; 1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 344; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 109; 1973, c. 440; 1974, c. 358; 1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 202; 1990, cc. 629, 673.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Transportation of juveniles. —

Statute authorizes the chief judge of a juvenile and domestic relations district court to order that local law-enforcement personnel shall be responsible for transporting violent and disruptive juveniles to court-ordered out-of-state destinations; when a local law-enforcement officer is transporting a prisoner in another state, he has only such law-enforcement authority over the prisoner as may be provided by the laws of that state. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable C.T. Woody, Jr., Sheriff, City of Richmond, No. 16-037, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (4/6/17).

§ 16.1-255.
Limitation on issuance of detention orders for juveniles; appearance by juvenile.

No detention order shall be issued for any juvenile except when authorized by the judge or intake officer of a juvenile court or by a magistrate as provided in §

16.1-256

.

In matters involving the issuance of detention orders each state or local court service unit shall ensure the capability of a prompt response by an intake officer who is either on duty or on call.

A child may appear before an intake officer either (i) by personal appearance before the intake officer or (ii) by the use of two-way electronic video and audio communication. All communications and proceedings shall be conducted in the same manner and the intake officer shall have the same powers as if the appearance were in person. Any documents filed may be transmitted by facsimile and the facsimile and any signatures thereon shall serve, for all purposes, as an original document. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used shall comply with the provisions of subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1985, c. 260; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 862; 2002, c. 700.

Cross references.

As to the provision of court services and replacement intake officers, see §

16.1-235.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2 and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “juvenile” for “child” and inserted “or by a magistrate as provided in §

16.1-256

.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 700 added the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

§ 16.1-256.
Limitations as to issuance of warrants for juveniles; detention orders.

No warrant of arrest shall be issued for any juvenile by a magistrate, except as follows:

As provided in §

16.1-260

on appeal from a decision of an intake officer to refuse to authorize a petition based solely upon a finding that no probable cause exists; or

Upon a finding of probable cause to believe that the child is in need of services or is a delinquent, when (i) the court is not open and (ii) the judge and the intake officer of the juvenile and domestic relations district court are not reasonably available. For purposes of this section, the phrase “not reasonably available” means that neither the judge nor the intake officer of the juvenile and domestic relations district court could be reached after the appearance by the juvenile before a magistrate or that neither could arrive within one hour after he was contacted.When a magistrate is authorized to issue a warrant pursuant to subdivision 2, he may also issue a detention order, if the criteria for detention set forth in §

16.1-248.1

have been satisfied.Warrants issued pursuant to this section shall be delivered forthwith to the juvenile court.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-195; 1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 344; 1973, c. 440; 1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 701; 1980, c. 234; 1981, c. 184; 1983, c. 349; 1986, c. 295; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 30.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendment by c. 755, in the first sentence, substituted “juvenile” for “child” in the introductory paragraph, redesignated former subdivision 3 as present subdivision 2, and in present subdivision 2, inserted “or” following “is not open,” deleted “and” following “not reasonably available,” and deleted clause (iii) which read: “the criteria for detention or shelter care set forth in §

16.1-248.1

have been satisfied,” and in the second sentence, substituted “means” for “shall mean,” inserted “neither” following “that,” substituted “nor the intake officer” for “or the intake officer,” deleted “not” following “court could,” and deleted “not” following “or could” and added the second paragraph of subdivision 2.

The 1996 amendment by c. 914 substituted “juvenile” for “child” following “shall be issued for any” in the first paragraph, redesignated former subdivision 3 as present subdivision 2, and in the first sentence, inserted “and” following “is not open” in clause (i), deleted “and” following “are not reasonably available” in clause (ii), and deleted clause (ii) which read: “the criteria for detention or shelter care set forth in §

16.1-248.1

have been satisfied,” in the second sentence, substituted “means that neither the judge nor the intake officer” for “shall mean that the judge or intake officer” following “ ‘not reasonably available’ ,” deleted “not” following “domestic relations district court could,” and substituted “or that neither could arrive” for “or could not arrive” following “by the juvenile before a magistrate” and added the present second paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 30, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “to refuse to authorize a petition based solely upon a finding that no probable cause exists” in subdivision 1.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

§ 16.1-257.
Interference with or obstruction of officer; concealment or removal of child.

No person shall interfere with or obstruct any officer, juvenile probation officer or other officer or employee of the court in the discharge of his duties under this law, nor remove or conceal or cause to be removed or concealed any child in order that he or she may not be brought before the court, nor interfere with or remove or attempt to remove any child who is in the custody of the court or of an officer or who has been lawfully committed under this law. Any person willfully violating any provision of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-191; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 16.1-258.
Bonds and forfeitures thereof.

All bonds and other undertakings taken and approved by any judicial officer as defined in §

19.2-119

, either for the appearance of any person or for the performance of any other duty or undertaking set forth in the bond, shall be valid and enforceable even if the principal in the bond shall be a person under eighteen years of age. In the event of a failure upon the part of the principal or sureties in any bond taken in such court to faithfully carry out and discharge the undertakings of such bond, the judge shall have the right to declare the bond forfeited in accordance with §

19.2-143

. The complainant in nonsupport cases shall not be required to furnish an indemnifying bond.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-189; 1956, c. 555; 1973, c. 440; 1977, c. 559; 1986, c. 26.